cv_RU/cv_RU.aff
SFX B 0 ӳнчен/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗртен/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е ӳнчен/RT е
SFX B е ӗртен/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӳнчен/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗртен/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӳнчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳнчен/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 ртен/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӳнчен/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗртен/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗнчен/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е инчен/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗнчен/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ винчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кинчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ линчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ минчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нинчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пинчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ ринчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ синчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ инчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тинчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хинчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чинчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шинчен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ инчен/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗнчен/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗмпе/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗмӗрпе/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 мпе/RT е
SFX B 0 мӗрпе/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмпе/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмӗрпе/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B 0 мпе/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 мӗрпе/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗмпе/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗмӗрпе/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳпе/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗрпе/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е ӳпе/RT е
SFX B е ӗрпе/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӳпе/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗрпе/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӳпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗрпе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳпе/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 рпе/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӳпе/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗрпе/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗпе/RT [^еӗиӳт]
SFX B т чӗпе/RT т
SFX B е ипе/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗпе/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ випе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кипе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ липе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мипе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нипе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пипе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рипе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сипе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ипе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ типе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хипе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чипе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шипе/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ипе/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗпе/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗмсӗр/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗмӗрсӗр/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 мсӗр/RT е
SFX B 0 мӗрсӗр/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмсӗр/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмӗрсӗр/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B 0 мсӗр/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 мӗрсӗр/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗмсӗр/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗмӗрсӗр/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳсӗр/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗрсӗр/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е ӳсӗр/RT е
SFX B е ӗрсӗр/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӳсӗр/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗрсӗр/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӳсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗрсӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳсӗр/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 рсӗр/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӳсӗр/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗрсӗр/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗсӗр/RT [^еӗиӳт]
SFX B т чӗсӗр/RT т
SFX B е исӗр/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗсӗр/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ висӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кисӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лисӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мисӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нисӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ писӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рисӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сисӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ исӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тисӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хисӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чисӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шисӗр/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ исӗр/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗсӗр/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗмшӗн/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗмӗршӗн/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 мшӗн/RT е
SFX B 0 мӗршӗн/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмшӗн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмӗршӗн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмшӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗмӗршӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
