cv_RU/cv_RU.dic
ҫӗлӗк/B
ҫавраҫил/B
ҫитӗнӳ/B
ӑш/AB
ӗҫкӗҫӗ/B
ӗҫтеш/B
ӗмӗт/B
ӗнӗл/B
ӗненӳсӗр/FB
ӗнчӗ/FB
ӗрехетлӗх/B
ӗскер/B
Авански/B
Аканьия/B
Алтти/B
Андалузи/B
Ассири/B
Ахтимӗр/B
Болгари/B
Буряти/B
Вартилет/B
Вестфали/B
Голланди/B
Дорофей/B
Екелей/B
Ементер/B
Ентирек/B
Етри/B
Закавказье/B
Игнатий/B
Илечей/B
Илтевер/B
Илтяк/B
Иордани/B
Искентер/B
Ителмес/B
Кӑспике/B
Кӗмшей/B
Кайкки/B
Кампет/B
Каталони/B
Керчь/B
Конфуций/B
Левер/B
Мӑкӑти/B
Маҫҫей/B
Мануэль/B
Матвей/B
Мекки/B
Мерхепе/B
Мин/B
Миннеки/B
Миччи/B
Мордови/B
Нарспи/B
Нигери/B
Паҫей/B
Пайхилтӗ/B
Пахвит/B
Пикӗне/B
Пиксӗвер/B
Пинер/B
Пинке/B
Питтимӗр/B
Португали/B
Припять/B
Раҫҫей/B
Рязань/B
Сӗверчен/B
Саватней/B
Савкачей/B
Савникер/B
Сакит/B
Саранпи/B
Сатйен/B
Сахмантей/B
Семкке/B
Сентилет/B
Серенке/B
Сертилет/B
Сехтин/B
Силкепи/B
Симеккей/B
Синегорье/B
Ситехмет/B
Смайер/B
Сызрань/B
Тӗхтепи/B
Тарйе/B
Тевлепи/B
Тереппин/B
Тимми/B
Трансвааль/B
Туймит/B
Тунӳк/B
Тьӑхти/B
Уланки/B
Унеҫ/B
Утимӗр/B
Ухвин/B
Флоренци/B
Хӗрпийе/B
Хаккиме/B
Хаттиме/B
Хуньтийер/B
Шӗвӗртек/B
Шелхивер/B
Шерехве/B
Шерхунне/B
Ылттӑнпи/B
Элкей/B
Элтепи/B
Эпселим/B
Эрнеҫ/B
Эстони/B
Югослави/B
Яхуне/B
аварисӗр/B
автономи/B
агролаборатори/B
акватори/B
аллегори/B
ами/B
анархи/B
анпуҫҫи/B
апоплекси/B
ари/B
асапланни/B
ассимиляци/B
атташе/B
аэронавигаци/B
библиотекарь/B
боти/B
вӑйпитти/B
вӗҫкӗнлӗх/B
вӗҫтеркӗч/B
вӗренелӗх/B
вӗрлӗклӗх/B
вӗтеленчӗк/B
вӗчӗлӗх/B
валь/B
венерологи/B
вертикаль/B
виҫе/B
вилӗ/B
вирӗк/B
витӗм/B
витлешӳ/B
воспитатель/B
выключатель/B
гаранти/B
генилӗх/B
гидрологи/B
главнокомандующи/B
граци/B
дегустаци/B
декламаци/B
демобилизаци/B
дерматологи/B
дивизи/B
дислокаци/B
диффузи/B
драматизаци/B
евангели/B
елчӗк/B
епархи/B
ерчӗн/B
ешчӗк/B
заземлени/B
зодчи/B
ие/B
изобретени/B
иксӗлӳ/B
илемсӗр/B
илтӗнӳ/B
импери/B
ингаляци/B
инке/B
интервенци/B
инфляци/B
ирҫе/B
ирсӗр/B
испытани/B
июль/B
йӗвен/B
йӗкел/B
йӗлтӗр/B
йӗпкӗнле/B
йӗрӗнчӗк/FB
йӗрӳ/B
йӗтре/B
йӳлехей/B
йӳтӗм/B
кӑшарни/B
кӗвӗсӗрлӗх/B
кӗле/B
кӗлте/B
кӗнтелем/B
кӗпелӗх/B
кӗрӗшӳҫӗ/B
кӗрепук/B
кӗркунне/B
кӗрпе/B
кӗскетӳ/B
кӗтӗ/B
кӗтӳҫ/B
кӗштек/B
кадриль/B
калинкке/B
кальци/B
кандиль/B
капӑрти/B
кармунь/B
кассаци/B
квалификаци/B
кесӗп/B
килӗ/B
килӗшӳсӗрлӗх/B
кимӗҫӗ/B
киностуди/B
кире/B
кисре/B
кишӗк/B
климатологи/B
колибри/B
комбинаци/B
компарти/B
кондитерски/B
констатаци/B
контузи/B
концлагерь/B
коррози/B
крематори/B
крупье/B
кулинари/B
курите/B
кушиле/B
кӳлешӳ/B
кӳпчеме/B
лӑкӑшти/B
лӗнкӗрчӗк/B
лаки/B
латифунди/B
лекнӗскер/B
ленкке/B
лифчик/B
люминесценци/B
мӑнаҫи/B
мӗлке/B
мӗшӗлкке/B
малаллахи/B
манти/B
машиноведени/B
меланхоли/B
мемеле/B
мероприяти/B
метизаци/B
мешехе/B
микрофотографи/B
мимикри/B
мистификаци/B
модернизаци/B
морзе/B
мультипликаци/B
мэри/B
навигаци/B
наступлени/B
нелет/B
нефтехими/B
нишлӗх/B
нӳрлӗх/B
общежити/B
олигархи/B
орги/B
охранени/B
пӗҫеркке/B
пӗкече/B
пӗлменлӗх/B
пӗрӗнчӗк/B
пӗркеленчӗк/B
пӗрмек/B
пӗрчӗ/B
пӗтӗмлӗх/B
пӗтре/B
пакӑлти/B
парламентари/B
паспортизаци/B
пекӗ/B
пепке/B
перхелей/B
пештӗр/B
пике/B
пилешлӗх/B
пирӗшти/B
питӗркӗч/B
планетари/B
позици/B
полномочи/B
поселени/B
правоведени/B
прери/B
программировани/B
протекци/B
психологи/B
пуленкке/B
пунеттей/B
путеке/B
пушхир/B
пӳлме/B
пӳрни/B
пӳшкӗн/B
радиолокаци/B
ралли/B
реакцилӗх/B
регенераци/B
резолюци/B
рентгенографи/B
репродукци/B
рецензи/B
сӑнӳкерчӗк/B
сӗм/FB
сӗрӗм/B
сӗтев/B
сакҫи/B
сандали/B
сейсмографи/B
семен/B
септет/B
сесси/B
сиен/B
сиккеленчӗк/B
силӗм/B
симфони/B
синхронилӗх/B
сисӗнкӗ/B
следстви/B
сооружени/B
спекуляци/B
станкостроени/B
стерилизаци/B
стройиндустри/B
суеҫӗ/B
сӳкен/B
сӳсмен/B
тӗкетмӗш/B
тӗмпӗс/B
тӗпсӗрлӗх/B
тӗрексӗр/B
тӗршӗнчӗк/B
талпиҫен/B
теленӳ/B
терминологи/B
тивлетлӗх/B
тимре/B
тирӗнчӗк/B
тонизаци/B
тригонометри/B
тӳлевсӗрлӗх/B
тӳремлӗх/B
узурпаци/B
урлуҫҫи/B
фашизаци/B
флекси/B
хӑйӗнни/B
хӗмӗл/B
хӗрпӗрчи/B
халер/B
хими/B
хистев/B
хӳрешке/B
чӑйӑлти/B
чӗлӗмӗш/B
чӗмсӗрлӗх/B
чӗркеленчӗк/B
чеелӗхсӗр/B
черетсӗрлӗх/B
чикӗшӳ/B
чӳлӗк/B
шӗвеклӗх/B
шеврет/B
шертешник/B
шлепкеҫӗ/B
ытлашшилӗх/B
экспроприаци/B
элем/B
энерги/B
эрленчӗк/B
эткер/B
ясли/B
ӳпке/B
ӳсӗмсӗр/B
